Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2362.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 HF 2362 (3) 91 je/ns/md H.F. 2362 Section 1. Section 262.9, subsection 19, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . d. Limit any increase in the amount of 3 tuition charged by an institution of higher education under 4 the boardâs control to a resident undergraduate student to the 5 average of the increases in the higher education price index 6 in the previous three years. This paragraph does not apply 7 to a resident undergraduate student in an academic year if 8 the tuition amount that can be charged to the student in the 9 academic year is limited pursuant to subsection 43. 10 Sec. 2. Section 262.9, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 11 following new subsection: 12 NEW SUBSECTION . 43. a. Direct each institution of higher 13 education governed by the board to establish a policy whereby 14 the tuition amount charged to students classified as residents 15 that is charged to an undergraduate student in the studentâs 16 first academic year of enrollment, commencing with a first 17 academic year of enrollment beginning in or after 2027, will 18 not increase in the studentâs subsequent academic years of 19 undergraduate enrollment. 20 b. This subsection only applies to an undergraduate student 21 if, upon enrollment, the student pays a fee to the institution 22 in an amount established by the board not to exceed ten percent 23 of the base resident undergraduate tuition amount for the 24 studentâs first academic year of enrollment. 25 c. For a student who begins the studentâs first academic 26 year of undergraduate enrollment with sufficient academic 27 transfer credits that the student can complete a baccalaureate 28 degree program in less than four academic years, this 29 subsection only applies for the number of academic years 30 necessary for the student to complete a degree program with the 31 studentâs academic transfer credits, rounded up. 32 d. If an undergraduate student transfers to another 33 institution of higher education governed by the board after the 34 studentâs first academic year of enrollment, and the tuition 35 -1- HF 2362 (3) 91 je/ns/md 1/ 2 H.F. 2362 amount that would have been charged to the student during that 1 first academic year by the institution to which the student 2 transfers is greater than the amount charged to the student 3 by the institution from which the student transferred, the 4 institution to which the student transfers may charge the 5 student the greater tuition amount. 6 e. This subsection does not apply to any academic years 7 beyond three consecutive academic years of undergraduate 8 enrollment after a studentâs first academic year of enrollment. 9 -2- HF 2362 (3) 91 je/ns/md 2/ 2